Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-962
Notices; how served.

All individual notices, service of which is provided for in the Noxious Weed Control Act, shall be in writing. Service of such notices shall be in the same manner as service of a summons in a civil action in the district court or by certified mail to the last-known address to be ascertained, if necessary, from the last tax list.

Laws 1965, c. 7, § 11, p. 86;

Laws 1987, LB 1, § 6;

Laws 1987, LB 138, § 11;

Laws 1989, LB 49, § 12.